Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5523HV (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2503 DIVISION I 1 GAMBLING 2 Section 1. Section 99D.5, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 4. Commission members are each entitled to receive an 5 annual salary of ten thousand dollars. Members shall also be 6 reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of 7 their duties to a maximum of thirty seventy thousand dollars 8 per year for the commission. Each member shall be covered by 9 the blanket surety bond of the state purchased pursuant to 10 section 8A.321, subsection 12 . 11 Sec. 2. Section 99F.15, subsection 4, unnumbered paragraph 12 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 A person commits a class âDâ felony and, in addition, shall 14 be barred for life from sports wagering, advance deposit sports 15 wagering, as defined in section 99F.9, excursion gambling 16 boats , and gambling structures under the jurisdiction of the 17 commission, if the person does any of the following: 18 Sec. 3. Section 99F.15, subsection 6, paragraph c, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 c. Two convictions of the offense of unlawful betting as 21 provided in this subsection shall result in the person being 22 barred for life from sports wagering, advance deposit sports 23 wagering, as defined in section 99F.9, excursion gambling 24 boats , and gambling structures under the jurisdiction of the 25 commission. 26 DIVISION II 27 STATE BUILDING CODE 28 Sec. 4. Section 103A.8C, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 29 to read as follows: 30 1. The commissioner, after consulting with and receiving 31 recommendations from the department of public defense homeland 32 security and emergency management and the department of natural 33 resources, shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A specifying 34 standards and requirements for design and construction of safe 35 -1- LSB 5523HV (2) 91 ss/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2503 rooms and storm shelters. In developing these standards, the 1 commissioner shall consider nationally recognized standards. 2 The standards and requirements shall be incorporated into the 3 state building code established in section 103A.7 , but shall 4 not be interpreted to require the inclusion of a safe room or 5 storm shelter in a building construction project unless such 6 inclusion is expressly required by another statute or by a 7 federal statute or regulation. However, if a safe room or 8 storm shelter is included in any building construction project 9 which reaches the design development phase on or after January 10 1, 2011, compliance with the standards developed pursuant to 11 this section shall be required. 12 Sec. 5. Section 103A.23, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 2. All fees collected by the commissioner shall be deposited 15 in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund of the 16 state licensing and regulation fund created in section 10A.507 . 17 DIVISION III 18 RESIDENTIAL CARE FACILITIES 19 Sec. 6. Section 135C.2, subsection 6, unnumbered paragraph 20 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 The department shall establish a special classification 22 within the residential care facility category for residential 23 care facilities which have the primary purpose of serving 24 pediatric palliative care patients and that only provides 25 respite care services and the services of a hospice program 26 as defined in section 135J.1 . A facility within the special 27 classification established pursuant to this subsection shall 28 be exempt from section 135.62 and may serve any number of 29 individuals, including zero . The department shall adopt rules 30 pursuant to chapter 17A which shall include but not be limited 31 to all of the following: 32